District of Columbia statutes.
8-2208

Suspension or revocation of license.

(a)

The Department may suspend or revoke the license of a wildlife control operator if the applicant:

(1)

Violates the provisions of this chapter or the conditions of the license; or

(2)

Engages in fraudulent business practices.

(b)

The Department shall suspend or revoke the license of a wildlife control operator if the applicant is convicted of an offense set forth in Chapter 10 of Title 22 [§ 22-1001 et seq.].

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-289, § 9, 57 DCR 11499
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008, 61 DCR 9990

History

Applicability of D.C. Law 18-289: Section 13 of D.C. Law 18-289, codified as § 8-2212, provided that §§ 8-2204 through 8-2209 shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. Section 8-2212 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008.

Editor's Notes